Nevada, session 83, SB314-82.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 701A.327 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
701A.327 1. “Facility for the storage of energy from
renewable generation” means a facility that is constructed or
installed for the [sole] purpose of storing electric energy received
from a facility for the generation of electricity from renewable
energy for release at a later time, including, without limitation, a
facility that is designed to use energy storage technology.
2. The term does not include a facility that is located on a
residential property.
Sec. 1.5. NRS 704.796 is hereby amended to read as follows:
704.796 [If, pursuant to NRS 704.795, the Commission
determines that it is in the public interest to establish by regulation
targets for the procurement of energy storage systems by an electric
utility, the]
1. The Commission shall adopt regulations:
[1.] (a) Establishing biennial targets for the procurement of
energy storage systems by [the] an electric utility;
[2.] (b) Setting forth the points of interconnection on the
electric grid for the implementation of energy storage systems;
[3.] (c) Establishing that an energy storage system may be
owned by the electric utility or any other person;
-
*SB314_R2*

– 3 –
[4.] (d) Establishing requirements for the filing by the electric
utility of annual or biennial plans to meet biennial targets for the
procurement and implementation of energy storage systems;
[5.] (e) Prescribing a procedure by which the Commission must,
at least once every 3 years, reevaluate the biennial targets for the
procurement of energy storage systems by the electric utility;
[6.] (f) Establishing a procedure by which an electric utility
may obtain a waiver or deferral of the biennial targets for the
procurement of energy storage systems if the electric utility is not
able to identify energy storage systems that provide benefits to
customers of the utility that exceed the costs of energy storage
systems; and
[7.] (g) Requiring the electric utility to include such information
as the Commission may require in each plan submitted by the
electric utility pursuant to NRS 704.741.
2. The Commission shall establish biennial targets pursuant
to subsection 1 that deliver the greatest benefits to the customers
of the electric utility in relation to the costs of the procurement of
energy storage systems. In calculating the benefits and costs of the
procurement of energy storage systems, the Commission shall
consider all known and measurable benefits and costs, including,
without limitation:
(a) A reduction in the need for the additional generation of
electricity by the electric utility during periods of peak demand;
(b) A reduction in line losses of the electric utility;
(c) The benefits and costs related to ancillary services of the
electric utility;
(d) Avoided costs to the electric utility for additional
generation, transmission and generation capacity;
(e) The benefits arising from a reduction of greenhouse gas
emissions and the emission of other air pollutants;
(f) The benefits and costs to the electric utility related to
voltage support;
(g) The benefits of diversifying the types of resources used for
the generation of electricity;
(h) The administrative costs incurred by the electric utility;
(i) The cost to the electric utility of the integration of energy
storage systems into the transmission and distribution grid; and
(j) The cost of the energy storage systems.
Sec. 2. NRS 704.797 is hereby amended to read as follows:
704.797 1. [If the Commission adopts regulations pursuant to
NRS 704.796 to establish biennial targets for the procurement of
energy storage systems by an electric utility, to] To meet the targets
set forth in [those] the regulations [, the] adopted pursuant to NRS
704.796, an electric utility may procure energy storage systems that
-
*SB314_R2*

– 4 –
are either centralized or distributed and either owned by the utility
or by any other person, as prescribed by regulation of the
Commission.
2. Electric energy storage systems procured by an electric
utility to meet [any] the biennial targets for the procurement of
energy storage systems established by regulation pursuant to NRS
704.796 must:
(a) Reduce peak demand for electricity;
(b) Avoid or defer investment by the electric utility in assets for
the generation, transmission and distribution of electricity;
(c) Improve the reliability of the operation of the transmission or
distribution grid;
(d) Reduce the emission of greenhouse gases or other air
pollutants; or
(e) Integrate renewable energy into the electric grid.
Sec. 3. Chapter 624 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A person shall not install an electrochemical energy
storage system in this State unless he or she:
(a) Holds a valid license in the classification required to
perform such work issued pursuant to this chapter and the
regulations of the Board;
(b) If the installation is for a property other than a residential
property and is performed on or after July 1, 2025, and except as
otherwise provided in subsection 2, ensures that the installation:
(1) Is performed by or under the direct supervision of a
person who holds a certificate demonstrating the successful
completion of the Energy Storage and Microgrid Training and
Certification program (ESAMTAC); and
(2) Conforms to any standards regarding the installation of
signage in connection with such systems as contained in the
Standard for the Installation of Stationary Energy Storage
Systems, NFPA 855, in the form most recently published by the
National Fire Protection Association.
2. The provisions of paragraph (b) of subsection 1 do not
apply to work on an electrochemical energy storage system which
is performed under a warranty by an employee of the
manufacturer of the electrochemical energy storage system.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Electrochemical energy storage system” means a
commercially available technology that is capable of receiving
electric energy and storing that energy by electrochemical means
in order to produce and deliver electricity at a later time.
(b) “Residential property” means:
-
*SB314_R2*

– 5 –
(1) Improved real estate that consists of not more than four
residential units; or
(2) A single-family residential unit, including, without
limitation, a condominium, townhouse or home within a
subdivision, if the unit is sold, leased or otherwise conveyed unit
by unit, regardless of whether the unit is part of a larger building
or parcel that consists of more than four units.
Sec. 4. NRS 624.3016 is hereby amended to read as follows:
624.3016 The following acts or omissions, among others,
constitute cause for disciplinary action under NRS 624.300:
1. Any fraudulent or deceitful act committed in the capacity of
a contractor, including, without limitation, misrepresentation or the
omission of a material fact.
2. A conviction of a violation of NRS 624.730, or a conviction
in this State or any other jurisdiction of a felony relating to the
practice of a contractor or a crime involving moral turpitude.
3. Knowingly making a false statement in or relating to the
recording of a notice of lien pursuant to the provisions of
NRS 108.226.
4. Failure to give a notice required by NRS 108.227, 108.245,
108.246 or 624.520.
5. Failure to comply with NRS 624.920, 624.930, 624.935 or
624.940 or any regulations of the Board governing contracts for
work concerning residential pools and spas.
6. Failure to comply with NRS 624.860 to 624.875, inclusive,
or any regulations of the Board governing contracts for work
concerning residential photovoltaic systems used to produce
electricity.
7. Failure to comply with NRS 624.600.
8. Misrepresentation or the omission of a material fact, or the
commission of any other fraudulent or deceitful act, to obtain a
license.
9. Failure to pay an assessment required pursuant to
NRS 624.470.
10. Failure to file a certified payroll report that is required for a
contract for a public work.
11. Knowingly submitting false information in an application
for qualification or a certified payroll report that is required for a
contract for a public work.
12. Failure to notify the Board of a conviction or entry of a
plea of guilty, guilty but mentally ill or nolo contendere pursuant to
NRS 624.266.
13. Failure to provide a builder’s warranty as required by NRS
624.602 or to respond reasonably to a claim made under a builder’s
warranty.
-
*SB314_R2*

– 6 –
14. Failure to comply with section 3 of this act.
Sec. 5. NRS 624.800 is hereby amended to read as follows:
624.800 For any violation of the provisions of NRS 624.005 to
624.750, inclusive, and section 3 of this act that is punishable as a
misdemeanor, an indictment must be found, or an information or
complaint filed, within 2 years after the commission of the offense.
Sec. 6. NRS 704.795 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 7. 1. This section and section 1 and 6 of this act become
effective upon passage and approval.
2. Sections 3, 4 and 5 of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On October 1, 2023, for all other purposes.
3. Sections 1.5 and 2 of this act become effective on July 1,
2024.
4. Section 1 of this act expires by limitation on June 30, 2049.
TEXT OF REPEALED SECTION
704.795 Commission required to determine whether targets
for the procurement of energy storage systems by electric utility
is in public interest; required factors to consider; calculation of
benefits and costs.
1. On or before October 1, 2018, the Commission shall
determine whether it is in the public interest to establish by
regulation biennial targets for the procurement of energy storage
systems by an electric utility.
2. In making the determination required by subsection 1, the
Commission shall consider:
(a) Whether the procurement of energy storage systems by an
electric utility will achieve the following purposes:
(1) The integration of renewable energy resources which
generate electricity on an intermittent basis into the transmission and
distribution grid of the electric utility.
(2) The improvement of the reliability of the systems for the
transmission and distribution of electricity.
(3) The increased use of renewable energy resources to
generate electricity.
(4) The reduction of the need for the additional generation of
electricity during periods of peak demand.
-
*SB314_R2*

– 7 –
(5) The avoidance or deferral of investment by the electric
utility in generation, transmission and distribution of electricity.
(6) The replacement of ancillary services provided by
facilities using fossil fuels with ancillary services provided by the
use of energy storage systems.
(7) The reduction of greenhouse gas emissions.
(b) The interconnection of energy storage systems at each point
of the electric grid, including, without limitation, in the transmission
and distribution of electricity and at the site of the customer.
3. For the purposes of subsection 1, the Commission shall
determine that the establishment of targets for the procurement of
energy storage systems by an electric utility is in the public interest
if the benefits to customers of the electric utility exceed the costs of
the procurement of energy storage systems. In calculating the
benefits and costs of the procurement of energy storage systems, the
Commission shall consider all known and measurable benefits and
costs, including, without limitation:
(a) A reduction in the need for the additional generation of
electricity during periods of peak demand;
(b) A reduction in line losses;
(c) The benefits and costs related to ancillary services;
(d) Avoided costs for additional generation, transmission and
generation capacity;
(e) The benefits arising from a reduction of greenhouse gas
emissions and the emission of other air pollutants;
(f) The benefits and costs related to voltage support;
(g) The benefits of diversifying the types of resources used for
the generation of electricity;
(h) The administrative costs incurred by the electric utility;
(i) The cost to the electric utility of the integration of energy
storage systems into the transmission and distribution grid; and
(j) The cost of energy storage systems.
H
-
*SB314_R2*